Utah statutes.
75-2-709.   Definitions -- Representation -- Per capita at each generation
-- Per stirpes.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Deceased child" or "deceased descendant" means a child or a descendant
who either predeceased the distribution date or is considered to have
predeceased the distribution date under Section 75-2-702.
(b)  "Distribution date," with respect to an interest, means the time when the
interest is to take effect in possession or enjoyment.  The distribution date
need not occur at the beginning or end of a calendar day, but can occur at a
time during the course of a day.
(c)  "Surviving ancestor," "surviving child," or "surviving descendant" means
an ancestor, a child, or a descendant who neither predeceased the distribution
date nor is considered to have predeceased the distribution date under Section
75-2-702.
(2)  If an applicable statute or a governing instrument calls for property to
be distributed  or taken "per capita at each generation," the property is
divided into as many equal shares as there are:
(a)  surviving descendants in the generation nearest to the designated
ancestor which contains one or more surviving descendants; and
(b)  deceased descendants in the same generation who left surviving
descendants, if any.  Each surviving descendant in the nearest generation is
allocated one share.  The remaining shares, if any, are combined and then
divided in the same manner among the surviving descendants of the deceased
descendants as if the surviving descendants who were allocated a share and
their surviving descendants had predeceased the distribution date.
(3)  If a governing instrument calls for property to be distributed or taken
"per stirpes," "by representation," or "by right of representation," the
property is divided into as many equal shares as there are:
(a)  surviving children of the designated ancestor; and
(b)  deceased children who left surviving descendants.  Each surviving child,
if any, is allocated one share.  The share of each deceased child with
surviving descendants is divided in the same manner, with subdivision
repeating at each succeeding generation until the property is fully allocated
among surviving descendants.
(4)  For the purposes of Subsections (2) and (3), an individual who is
deceased and left no surviving descendant is disregarded, and an individual
who leaves a surviving ancestor who is a descendant of the designated ancestor
is not entitled to a share.
